Hawaii statutes.
[§339D-6] Department responsibility. Beginning
January 1, 2010, the department shall maintain and update a website and a
toll-free number with current information on where covered entities can return
covered electronic devices for recycling. [L Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Subsection (a) designation omitted.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next